Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 4 Emergency Services

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency Medical Services, Official Compilation of the Rules and Reg- ulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Emergency Preparedness, Subject 511-9-2.

31-11-80.
Short title.

This article shall be known and cited as the “Emergency Services Law.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 668, § 1.

31-11-81.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Emergency condition” means any physical or mental condition of a recent onset and severity, including but not limited to severe pain, regardless of the initial, interim, final, or other diagnoses that are given, that would lead a prudent layperson, possessing an average knowledge of medicine and health, to believe that his or her condition, sickness, or injury is of such a nature that failure to obtain immediate medical care could result in:

Placing the patient’s health in serious jeopardy;

Serious impairment to bodily functions; or

Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.

“Emergency medical provider” means any provider of emergency medical transportation licensed or permitted by the Department of Public Health, any hospital licensed or permitted by the Department of Community Health, any hospital based service, or any physician licensed by the Georgia Composite Medical Board who provides emergency services.

“Emergency services” means emergency medical transportation or health care services provided in a hospital emergency facility to evaluate and treat any emergency condition.

“Prospective authorization” means contacting for approval or authorization to evaluate and treat a patient any insurer, health maintenance organization, hospital medical service corporation, or health benefit plan, a representative of which is not physically present in the hospital’s emergency department at the time such patient presents for emergency services.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 668, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 652, § 1/HB 1257; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-28/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 2/HB 509; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-17/HB 214; Ga. L. 2022, p. 598, § 2/HB 1324.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in paragraph (1), substituted “physical or mental condition” for “medical condition” near the beginning and in- serted “regardless of the initial, interim, final, or other diagnoses that are given,” in the middle.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 598, § 1/HB 1324, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) This state recognizes a ‘prudent layperson’ standard with regard to the need for emergency care;

“(2) Insurance companies operating in this state are required to adhere to that standard;

“(3) Patients in this state have had emergency medical claims denied due to insurers’ failure to adhere to the prudent layperson standard as intended;

“(4) The federal court system has recognized that this standard is not intended to look to the diagnosis that a patient receives. Rather, the only relevant considerations are the patient’s symptoms and whether a prudent layperson would think that emergency medical attention is necessary based on those symptoms;

“(5) This legislative body has intended and continues to intend that the prudent layperson standard be applied in the same manner;

“(6) In order to better protect Georgians seeking emergency care, legislation is needed not to change the meaning but to clarify the intended application of the prudent layperson standard in this state; and

“(7) Nothing in this Act is intended to be applicable to healthcare plans which are subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. Section 1001, et seq.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-11-82.
Evaluation of person with emergency condition; initiation of intervention without prospective authorization; insurer may not deny payment after prospective authorization given.

Once a person with an emergency condition presents himself or herself to an emergency medical provider for emergency services, that person shall be evaluated by medical personnel. This evaluation may include diagnostic testing to assess the extent of the condition, sickness, or injury if such testing is appropriate to stabilize the patient’s condition. For purposes of this Code section, the term “emergency medical provider” includes without limitation an emergency services provider.

If in the opinion of the attending physician or licensed ambulance service personnel acting under the medical direction of an ambulance service medical director as defined in Code Section 31-11-60.1 the evaluation provided under subsection (a) of this Code section warrants, he or she may initiate appropriate intervention to stabilize the condition of the patient without seeking or receiving prospective authorization by an insurer, a health maintenance organization, or a private health benefit plan. No insurer, health maintenance organization, or private health benefit plan may subsequently deny payment for an evaluation, diagnostic testing, or treatment provided as part of such intervention for an emergency condition.

No insurer, health maintenance organization, or private health benefit plan which has given prospective authorization after the stabilization of a person’s condition as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section for an evaluation, diagnostic testing, or treatment provided for in this article may subsequently deny payment for the provision of such evaluation, diagnostic testing, or treatment. An acknowledgment of an enrollee’s eligibility for benefits by the insurer, health maintenance organization, or private health benefit plan shall not, by itself, be construed as a prospective authorization for the purposes of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 668, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 908, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 652, § 2/HB 1257.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, a comma was deleted following “attending physician” at the beginning of subsection (b).